Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.160

Liability of commission's assets—Immunity of state, commission employees, etc.

Obligations incurred by the commission and liabilities or claims against the commission shall be enforced only against the assets of the commission in the same manner as if it were a corporation and no liability for the debts or actions of the commission shall exist against either the state of Washington or any subdivision or instrumentality thereof or against any member officer, employee, or agent of the commission in his or her individual capacity. The members of the commission including employees of the commission shall not be held responsible individually or any way whatsoever to any person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or omission, as principal, agent, person, or employees, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No such person or employee shall be held responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission. The liability of the members of the commission shall be several and not joint and no member shall be liable for the default of any other member.

[ 2011 c 336 s 437; 1969 c 133 s 15.]